Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-213 Authority issued or denied.
(a) If the commissioner finds that an insurer has met the requirements for and
is fully entitled thereto under this code, the commissioner shall issue to it a
proper certificate of authority.

(b) If the commissioner does not so find, the
commissioner shall deny the insurer certificate of authority within a
reasonable length of time following filing of the application by the insurer.

(c) The certificate of authority of a
reciprocal insurer shall be issued to its attorney in the name of the insurer.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next